Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 468A.300 to
468A.330.
SECTION 2. The Department of Environmental Quality may not,  pursuant to the federal
operating permit program established under ORS 468A.315, require an  air curtain incinerator
to have a Title V operating permit if the air curtain incinerator:
(1) Burns only wood waste, clean lumber or yard waste; and
(2) Is not otherwise required to obtain a Title  V operating permit under the Clean Air
Act or any regulation of the federal Environmental Protection Agency.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2332 (HB 2332-INTRO) Page 1